Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-710
Ground water management plan preparation or modification; district; solicit and utilize information.

During preparation or modification of a ground water management plan, the district shall actively solicit public comments and opinions and shall utilize and draw upon existing research, data, studies, or any other information which has been compiled by or is in the possession of state or federal agencies, natural resources districts, or any other subdivision of the state. State agencies, districts, and other subdivisions shall furnish information or data upon the request of any district preparing or modifying such a plan. A district shall not be required to initiate new studies or data-collection efforts or to develop computer models in order to prepare or modify a plan.

Laws 1982, LB 375, § 4;

R.S.1943, (1993), § 46-673.02;

Laws 1996, LB 108, § 19;

R.S.1943, (1998), § 46-656.13;

Laws 2004, LB 962, § 50.